District of Columbia statutes.
34-2202.14

Procurement system inapplicable.

Except as provided in § 34-2202.17(b), Chapter 3A of Title 2 [§ 2-351.01 et seq.] shall not apply to the Authority.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-111, § 214, 43 DCR 548
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 216(a), 59 DCR 6190
This section is referenced in § 34-2202.02.
1981 Ed., § 43-1684.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “Chapter 3A of Title 2” for “§ 2-301.01 et seq.”